Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 2. Health Provisions.

§ 22.1-270.
Preschool physical examinations.

No pupil shall be admitted for the first time to any public kindergarten or elementary school in a school division unless such pupil shall furnish, prior to admission, (i) a report from a qualified licensed physician, or a licensed nurse practitioner or licensed physician assistant acting under the supervision of a licensed physician, of a comprehensive physical examination of a scope prescribed by the State Health Commissioner performed within the 12 months prior to the date such pupil first enters such public kindergarten or elementary school or (ii) records establishing that such pupil furnished such report upon prior admission to another school or school division and providing the information contained in such report.If the pupil is a homeless child or youth as defined in subdivision A 7 of § 22.1-3, and for that reason cannot furnish the report or records required by (i) or (ii) of this subsection, and the person seeking to enroll the pupil furnishes to the school division an affidavit so stating and also indicating that, to the best of his knowledge, such pupil is in good health and free from any communicable or contagious disease, the school division shall immediately refer the student to the local school division liaison, as described in Subtitle VII-B of the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act, as amended (42 U.S.C. § 11431 et seq.) (the Act), who shall, as soon as practicable, assist in obtaining the necessary physical examination by the county or city health department or other clinic or physician’s office and shall immediately admit the pupil to school, as required by such Act.

The physician, or licensed nurse practitioner or licensed physician assistant acting under the supervision of a licensed physician, making a report of a physical examination required by this section shall, at the end of such report, summarize the abnormal physical findings, if any, and shall specifically state what, if any, conditions are found that would identify the child as handicapped.

Such physical examination report shall be placed in the child’s health record at the school and shall be made available for review by any employee or official of the State Department of Health or any local health department at the request of such employee or official.

Such physical examination shall not be required of any child whose parent shall object on religious grounds and who shows no visual evidence of sickness, provided that such parent shall state in writing that, to the best of his knowledge, such child is in good health and free from any communicable or contagious disease.

The health departments of all of the counties and cities of the Commonwealth shall conduct such physical examinations for medically indigent children without charge upon request and may provide such examinations to others on such uniform basis as such departments may establish.

Parents of entering students shall complete a health information form which shall be distributed by the local school divisions. Such forms shall be developed and provided jointly by the Department of Education and Department of Health, or developed and provided by the school division and approved by the Superintendent of Public Instruction. Such forms shall be returnable within 15 days of receipt unless reasonable extensions have been granted by the superintendent or his designee. Upon failure of the parent to complete such form within the extended time, the superintendent may send to the parent written notice of the date he intends to exclude the child from school; however, no child who is a homeless child or youth as defined in subdivision A 7 of § 22.1-3 shall be excluded from school for such failure to complete such form.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-220.1; 1972, c. 761; 1973, c. 300; 1974, c. 160; 1979, cc. 120, 260; 1980, c. 559; 1982, c. 510; 1983, c. 195; 1985, c. 334; 2000, cc. 209, 617, 646; 2001, c. 261; 2004, cc. 500, 967; 2018, c. 394; 2019, c. 586.

Cross references.

As to accepting children for placement in homes, facilities, etc., by local boards, see §

63.2-900

.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 209 added the second paragraph in subsection A.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 617 and 646 are identical, and in subsection A (i), inserted the language beginning “or a licensed nurse” and ending “a licensed physician” and substituted “performed within the” for “performed no earlier than”; in subsection B, inserted the language beginning “or licensed nurse” and ending “a licensed physician”; and repealed subsection H, relating to children admitted to a public school prior to July 1, 1972.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 261 inserted “or licensed physician assistant” in the first paragraph of subsection A and in subsection B.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 500 rewrote the last paragraph in subsection A, which formerly read: “If the pupil has no fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence, and has a primary nighttime residence as described in § 22.1-3, and for that reason cannot furnish the report or records required by (i) or (ii) of this subsection, and the person seeking to enroll the pupil furnishes to the school division an affidavit so stating, the school division shall refer the student for physical examination by the county or city health department and admit the pupil to school pending receipt of the report from such physical examination”; throughout, deleted “or guardian” following “parent”; in subsection I, deleted “or guardians” following “Parents” in the first sentence and added the language beginning “however, no child who is a homeless child” at the end of the last sentence; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2004 amendment by c. 967, in the second paragraph of susection A, deleted “subdivision 6 of” preceding “§ 22.1-3,” deleted “F., G., H. [Repealed.]” following subsection E; and redesignated former subsection I as subsection F.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 394 in the second paragraph of subsection A, inserted “subdivision A 6 of” preceding “§ 22.1-3” and substituted “Subtitle VII-B of the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act” for “the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Education Assistance Improvements Act of 2001.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 586 substituted “subdivision A 7 of § 22.1-3” for “subdivision A 6 of § 22.1-3” in subsections A and F.

Law Review.

For note on AIDS in the public schools, see 29 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 881 (1988).

For 2003/2004 survey of education law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 183 (2004).

§ 22.1-271.
Repealed by Acts 1982, c. 510.

§ 22.1-271.1.
Definitions.

For the purpose of § 22.1-271.2:

“Admit”
or

“admission”

means the official enrollment or reenrollment for attendance at any grade level, whether full-time or part-time, of any student by any school.

“Admitting official”
means the school principal or his designated representative if a public school; if a nonpublic school or child-care center, the principal, headmaster or director of the school or center.

“Documentary proof”
means written certification that a student has been immunized, such certificate to be on a form provided by the State Department of Health and signed by the licensed immunizing physician or an employee of the immunizing local health department.

“Student”
means any person who seeks admission to a school, or for whom admission to a school is sought by a parent or guardian, and who will not have attained the age of 20 years by the start of the school term for which admission is sought.

“Immunized”
or

“immunization”

means initial immunization and any boosters or reimmunizations required by §

32.1-46

.

“School”
means (i) any public school from kindergarten through grade 12 operated under the authority of any locality within the Commonwealth, (ii) any private or religious school that offers instruction at any level or grade from kindergarten through grade twelve, and (iii) any private or religious nursery school or preschool, or any private or religious child-care center required to be licensed by the Commonwealth.

History.

1982, c. 510; 1983, c. 433; 2005, c. 928.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 928, in the definition of “School,” substituted “religious” for “parochial” in three places and made minor stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For note on AIDS in the public schools, see 29 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 881 (1988).

§ 22.1-271.2.
Immunization requirements.

No student shall be admitted by a school unless at the time of admission the student or his parent submits documentary proof of immunization to the admitting official of the school or unless the student is exempted from immunization pursuant to subsection C or is a homeless child or youth as defined in subdivision A 7 of § 22.1-3. If a student does not have documentary proof of immunization, the school shall notify the student or his parent (i) that it has no documentary proof of immunization for the student; (ii) that it may not admit the student without proof unless the student is exempted pursuant to subsection C, including any homeless child or youth as defined in subdivision A 7 of § 22.1-3; (iii) that the student may be immunized and receive certification by a licensed physician, licensed nurse practitioner, registered nurse or an employee of a local health department; and (iv) how to contact the local health department to learn where and when it performs these services. Neither this Commonwealth nor any school or admitting official shall be liable in damages to any person for complying with this section.Any physician, nurse practitioner, registered nurse or local health department employee performing immunizations shall provide to any person who has been immunized or to his parent, upon request, documentary proof of immunizations conforming with the requirements of this section.

Any student whose immunizations are incomplete may be admitted conditionally if that student provides documentary proof at the time of enrollment of having received at least one dose of the required immunizations accompanied by a schedule for completion of the required doses within 90 calendar days. If the student requires more than two doses of hepatitis B vaccine, the conditional enrollment period shall be 180 calendar days.The immunization record of each student admitted conditionally shall be reviewed periodically until the required immunizations have been received.Any student admitted conditionally and who fails to comply with his schedule for completion of the required immunizations shall be excluded from school until his immunizations are resumed.

No certificate of immunization shall be required for the admission to school of any student if (i) the student or his parent submits an affidavit to the admitting official stating that the administration of immunizing agents conflicts with the student’s religious tenets or practices; or (ii) the school has written certification from a licensed physician, licensed nurse practitioner, or local health department that one or more of the required immunizations may be detrimental to the student’s health, indicating the specific nature and probable duration of the medical condition or circumstance that contraindicates immunization.However, if a student is a homeless child or youth as defined in subdivision A 7 of § 22.1-3 and (a) does not have documentary proof of necessary immunizations or has incomplete immunizations and (b) is not exempted from immunization pursuant to clauses (i) or (ii) of this subsection, the school division shall immediately admit such student and shall immediately refer the student to the local school division liaison, as described in the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Education Assistance Improvements Act of 2001, as amended (42 U.S.C. § 11431 et seq.) (the Act), who shall assist in obtaining the documentary proof of, or completing, immunization and other services required by such Act.

The admitting official of a school shall exclude from the school any student for whom he does not have documentary proof of immunization or notice of exemption pursuant to subsection C, including notice that such student is a homeless child or youth as defined in subdivision A 7 of § 22.1-3.

Every school shall record each student’s immunizations on the school immunization record. The school immunization record shall be a standardized form provided by the State Department of Health, which shall be a part of the mandatory permanent student record. Such record shall be open to inspection by officials of the State Department of Health and the local health departments.The school immunization record shall be transferred by the school whenever the school transfers any student’s permanent academic or scholastic records.Within 30 calendar days after the beginning of each school year or entrance of a student, each admitting official shall file a report with the local health department. The report shall be filed on forms prepared by the State Department of Health and shall state the number of students admitted to school with documentary proof of immunization, the number of students who have been admitted with a medical or religious exemption and the number of students who have been conditionally admitted, including those students who are homeless children or youths as defined in subdivision A 7 of § 22.1-3.

The requirement for Haemophilus Influenzae Type b immunization as provided in §

32.1-46

shall not apply to any child admitted to any grade level, kindergarten through grade 12.

The Board of Health shall promulgate rules and regulations for the implementation of this section in congruence with rules and regulations of the Board of Health promulgated under §

32.1-46

and in cooperation with the Board of Education.

History.

1982, c. 510; 1983, c. 433; 1988, c. 216; 1989, c. 382; 2000, c. 476; 2004, c. 500; 2011, c. 125; 2012, c. 181; 2019, c. 586.

Cross references.

As to accepting children for placement in homes, facilities, etc., by local boards, see §

63.2-900

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1223, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Health and the Department of Education shall jointly review §§ 22.1-271.2 and

32.1-46

of the Code of Virginia as amended by this act and report to the House Committee on Health, Welfare and Institutions and the Senate Committee on Education and Health on the effectiveness of the required vaccination program in promoting public health by December 1, 2021.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, substituted “(42 U.S.C. § 11431 et seq.) (the Act)” for “(42 U.S.C. § 11431 et seq.)(the Act)” in the second paragraph of subsection C.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 476, in subsection A, inserted “registered nurse” in clause (iii) and near the beginning of the second paragraph.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 500, throughout the section, deleted “or guardian” following “parent”; in subsection A, in the first paragraph, added the language beginning “or is a homeless child” at the end of the first sentence and inserted the language “including any homeless child . . . of § 22.1-3” in clause (ii) of the next-to-last sentence; added the last paragraph in subsection C; added the language beginning “including notice that such student” at the end of subsection D; added the language beginning “including those students” at the end of the last paragraph of subsection E; deleted the first paragraph in subsection F, which formerly read: “The requirement for mumps immunization as provided in §

32.1-46

shall not apply to any child admitted for the first time to any grade level, kindergarten through grade twelve, of a school prior to August 1, 1981”; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 125, in the first paragraph in subsections A and C, inserted “licensed nurse practitioner”; and in the last paragraph in subsection A, inserted “nurse practitioner.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 181, in the first paragraph of subsection B, inserted “calendar” preceding “days” at the end of the first sentence, and added the second sentence.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 586 substituted “subdivision A 7 of § 22.1-3” for “subdivision A 6 of § 22.1-3” throughout.

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia health law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 853 (2000).

§ 22.1-271.3.
Guidelines for school attendance for children infected with human immunodeficiency virus; school personnel training required; notification of school personnel in certain cases.

The Board, in cooperation with the Board of Health, shall develop, and revise as necessary, model guidelines for school attendance for children infected with human immunodeficiency virus. The Board shall distribute copies of these guidelines to each division superintendent and every school board member in the Commonwealth immediately following development or revision.

Each school board shall adopt guidelines for school attendance for children with human immunodeficiency virus. Such guidelines shall be consistent with the model guidelines for such school attendance developed by the Board.

Every school board shall ensure that all school personnel having direct contact with students receive appropriate training in the etiology, prevention, transmission modes, and effects of blood-borne pathogens, specifically, hepatitis B and human immunodeficiency viruses or any other infections that are the subject of regulations promulgated by the Safety and Health Codes Board of the Virginia Occupational Safety and Health Program within the Department of Labor and Industry.

Upon notification by a school employee who believes he has been involved in a possible exposure-prone incident that may have exposed the employee to the blood or body fluids of a student, the division superintendent shall contact the local health director who, upon immediate investigation of the incident, shall determine if a potentially harmful exposure has occurred and make recommendations, based upon all information available to him, regarding how the employee can reduce any risks from such exposure. The division superintendent shall share these recommendations with the school employee. Except as permitted by §

32.1-45.1

, the division superintendent and the school employee shall not divulge any information provided by the local health director regarding such student. The information provided by the local health director shall be subject to any applicable confidentiality requirements set forth in Chapter 2 (§

32.1-35

et seq.) of Title 32.1.

History.

1989, c. 613; 1997, c. 685; 2003, c. 1; 2022, c. 355.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1, in subsection D, substituted “notification by” for “request from” near the beginning of the first sentence, and added “Except as permitted by §

32.1-45.1

” at the beginning of the third sentence.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 355 in subsection A at the beginning and in subsection B, deleted “of Education” following “Board”; in subsection A, deleted the former second sentence, which read: “The first such guidelines shall be completed by December 1, 1989” and substituted “development or revision” for “completion”; in subsection B, deleted “by July 1, 1990” following “Each school board shall”; and made stylistic changes.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9A M.J. Health & Sanitation, § 1; 16 M.J. Schools, § 1.

§ 22.1-271.4.
Health requirements for home-instructed, exempted, and excused children.

In addition to compliance with the requirements of subsection B, D, or I of § 22.1-254 or § 22.1-254.1, any parent, guardian or other person having control or charge of a child being home instructed, exempted or excused from school attendance shall comply with the immunization requirements provided in §

32.1-46

in the same manner and to the same extent as if the child has been enrolled in and is attending school.

Upon request by the division superintendent, the parent shall submit to such division superintendent documentary proof of immunization in compliance with §

32.1-46

.

No proof of immunization shall be required of any child upon submission of (i) an affidavit to the division superintendent stating that the administration of immunizing agents conflicts with the parent’s or guardian’s religious tenets or practices or (ii) a written certification from a licensed physician, licensed nurse practitioner, or local health department that one or more of the required immunizations may be detrimental to the child’s health, indicating the specific nature of the medical condition or circumstance that contraindicates immunization.

History.

1993, c. 659; 1999, cc. 488, 552; 2010, c. 605; 2011, c. 125.

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendments by cc. 488 and 552 are identical, and substituted “subsection B, C, or H of § 22.1-254 or § 22.1-254.1” for “§ 22.1-254.1, § 22.1-256, or § 22.1-257” in the first paragraph.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 605 substituted “subsection B, D, or I” for “subsection B, C, or H” in the first paragraph.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 125 inserted “licensed nurse practitioner, or local health department” in clause (ii) of the last paragraph.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

16 M.J. Schools, § 23.

§ 22.1-271.5.
Guidelines and policies and procedures on concussions in student-athletes.

The Board of Education shall develop, biennially update, and distribute to each local school division guidelines on policies to inform and educate coaches, student-athletes, and student-athletes’ parents or guardians of the nature and risk of concussions, criteria for removal from and return to play, risks of not reporting the injury and continuing to play, and the effects of concussions on student-athletes’ academic performance.

Each local school division shall develop and biennially update policies and procedures regarding the identification and handling of suspected concussions in student-athletes. Such policies shall:

Require that in order to participate in any extracurricular physical activity, each student-athlete and the student-athlete’s parent or guardian shall review, on an annual basis, information on concussions provided by the local school division. After having reviewed materials describing the short- and long-term health effects of concussions, each student-athlete and the student-athlete’s parent or guardian shall sign a statement acknowledging receipt of such information, in a manner approved by the Board of Education;

Require a student-athlete suspected by that student-athlete’s coach, athletic trainer, or team physician of sustaining a concussion or brain injury in a practice or game to be removed from the activity at that time. A student-athlete who has been removed from play, evaluated, and suspected to have a concussion or brain injury shall not return to play that same day nor until (i) evaluated by an appropriate licensed health care provider as determined by the Board of Education and (ii) in receipt of written clearance to return to play from such licensed health care provider.The licensed health care provider evaluating student-athletes suspected of having a concussion or brain injury may be a volunteer; and

Include a “Return to Learn Protocol” with the following requirements:

School personnel shall be alert to cognitive and academic issues that may be experienced by a student who has suffered a concussion or other head injury, including (i) difficulty with concentration, organization, and long-term and short-term memory; (ii) sensitivity to bright lights and sounds; and (iii) short-term problems with speech and language, reasoning, planning, and problem solving; and

School personnel shall accommodate the gradual return to full participation in academic activities of a student who has suffered a concussion or other head injury as appropriate, based on the recommendation of the student’s licensed health care provider as to the appropriate amount of time that such student needs to be away from the classroom.

Each non-interscholastic youth sports program utilizing public school property shall either (i) establish policies and procedures regarding the identification and handling of suspected concussions in student-athletes, consistent with either the local school division’s policies and procedures developed in compliance with this section or the Board’s Guidelines for Policies on Concussions in Student-Athletes, or (ii) follow the local school division’s policies and procedures as set forth in subsection B. In addition, local school divisions may provide the guidelines to organizations sponsoring athletic activity for student-athletes on school property. Local school divisions shall not be required to enforce compliance with such policies.

As used in this section, “non-interscholastic youth sports program” means a program organized for recreational athletic competition or recreational athletic instruction for youth.

History.

2010, c. 483; 2014, cc. 746, 760; 2016, c. 151; 2019, c. 142.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2010, c. 483, cl. 2, provides: “That the Board of Education, in developing the policies pursuant to subsection A of § 22.1-271.5, shall work with the Virginia High School League, the Department of Health, the Virginia Athletic Trainers Association, representatives of the Children’s Hospital of the King’s Daughters and the Children’s National Medical Center, the Brain Injury Association of Virginia, the American Academy of Pediatrics, the Virginia College of Emergency Physicians and other interested stakeholders.”

Acts 2010, c. 483, cl. 3, provides: “That the policies of the Board of Education developed pursuant to subsection A of § 22.1-271.5 shall become effective on July 1, 2011.”

Acts 2014, cc. 746 and 760, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Education shall review and revise the guidelines as necessary, pursuant to subsection A of § 22.1-271.5 of the Code of Virginia, and shall work with the Virginia High School League, the Department of Health, the Virginia Athletic Trainers Association, the Virginia Physical Therapy Association, representatives of the Children’s Hospital of the King’s Daughters and the Children’s National Medical Center, the Brain Injury Association of Virginia, the American Academy of Pediatrics, the Virginia College of Emergency Physicians, the Virginia Academy of Family Physicians, the Virginia Association of School Nurses, a representative from a non-interscholastic youth sports program, and any other interested stakeholders.”

Acts 2019, c. 142, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Education shall collaborate with the Virginia High School League, the Virginia Department of Health, the Virginia Athletic Trainers’ Association, the Virginia Physical Therapy Association, representatives of the Children’s Hospital of the King’s Daughters and the Children’s National Health System, the Brain Injury Association of Virginia, the American Academy of Pediatrics, the Virginia College of Emergency Physicians, the Virginia Academy of Family Physicians, the Virginia Association of School Nurses, a representative from a non-interscholastic youth sports program, and any other interested stakeholders that it deems appropriate to biennially update its guidelines on policies to inform and educate coaches, student-athletes, and student-athletes’ parents or guardians of the nature and risk of concussions, criteria for removal from and return to play, risks of not reporting the injury and continuing to play, and the effects of concussions on student-athletes’ academic performance pursuant to subsection A of § 22.1-271.5 of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 746 and 760 are identical and, in subsection A, inserted “and the effects of concussions on student-athletes’ academic performance” and made related changes; in subsection C added the first sentence; and added subsection D.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 151, in subsection B, deleted “require” at the end of the introductory paragraph; in subdivision B 1, inserted “Require that”; in subdivision B 2, inserted “Require” and substituted “to be removed” for “shall be removed”; added subdivision B 3.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 142, in subsection A, inserted “biennially update” and substituted “student-athletes’ ” for “their”; and in subsection B, inserted “and biennially update.”

Law Review.

For article, “Medical Malpractice Law,” see 45 U. Rich. L. Rev. 319 (2010).

§ 22.1-271.6.
School division policies and procedures on concussions in students.

The Board of Education shall amend its guidelines for school division policies and procedures on concussions in student-athletes to include a “Return to Learn Protocol” with the following requirements:

School personnel shall be alert to cognitive and academic issues that may be experienced by a student who has suffered a concussion or other head injury, including (i) difficulty with concentration, organization, and long-term and short-term memory; (ii) sensitivity to bright lights and sounds; and (iii) short-term problems with speech and language, reasoning, planning, and problem solving; and

School personnel shall accommodate the gradual return to full participation in academic activities of a student who has suffered a concussion or other head injury as appropriate, based on the recommendation of the student’s licensed health care provider as to the appropriate amount of time that such student needs to be away from the classroom.

History.

2014, c. 349; 2016, c. 151.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2014, c. 349 was codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 151, in subdivision 1, substituted “student” for “student-athlete”; in subdivision 2, substituted “of a student” for “by a student-athlete,” “student’s” for “student-athlete’s” and “student” for “student-athlete.”

§ 22.1-271.7.
Public middle school student-athletes; pre-participation physical examination.

No public middle school student shall be a participant on or try out for any school athletic team or squad with a predetermined roster, regular practices, and scheduled competitions with other middle schools unless such student has submitted to the school principal a signed report from a licensed physician, a licensed nurse practitioner practicing in accordance with the provisions of §

54.1-2957

, or a licensed physician assistant acting under the supervision of a licensed physician attesting that such student has been examined, within the preceding 12 months, and found to be physically fit for athletic competition.

History.

2016, c. 692; 2018, c. 776.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 776 substituted “the provisions of §

54.1-2957

” for “his practice agreement.”

§ 22.1-271.8.
Sudden cardiac arrest prevention in student-athletes.

The Board of Education shall develop, biennially update, and distribute to each local school division guidelines on policies to inform and educate coaches, student-athletes, and student-athletes’ parents or guardians about the nature and risk of sudden cardiac arrest, procedures for removal from and return to play, and the risks of not reporting symptoms. The guidelines shall also be posted on the Department’s website.

Each local school division shall develop and biennially update policies and procedures regarding the identification and handling of symptoms that may lead to sudden cardiac arrest in student-athletes. Such policies shall:

Require that in order to participate in any extracurricular physical activity, each student-athlete and the student-athlete’s parent or guardian shall review, on an annual basis, information provided by the local school division on symptoms that may lead to sudden cardiac arrest. After reviewing the materials, each student-athlete and the student-athlete’s parent or guardian shall sign a statement acknowledging receipt of such information, in a manner approved by the Board of Education.

Require that a student-athlete who is experiencing symptoms that may lead to sudden cardiac arrest be immediately removed from play. A student-athlete who is removed from play shall not return to play until he is evaluated by and receives written clearance to return to physical activity by an appropriate licensed health care provider as determined by the Board of Education. The licensed health care provider evaluating student-athletes may be a volunteer.

History.

2020, c. 694.

§ 22.1-272.
Contagious and infectious diseases.

Persons suffering with contagious or infectious disease shall be excluded from the public schools while in that condition.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-249; 1968, c. 445; 1970, c. 526; 1973, c. 491; 1974, c. 160; 1977, c. 220; 1979, c. 262; 1980, c. 559.

Law Review.

For comment, “AIDS and Employment Discrimination under the Federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 and Virginia’s Rights of Persons with Disabilities Act,” see 20 U. Rich. L. Rev. 425 (1986).

For note on AIDS in the public schools, see 29 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 881 (1988).

§ 22.1-272.1.
Responsibility to contact parent of student at imminent risk of suicide; notice to be given to social services if parental abuse or neglect; Board of Education, in cooperation with the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services and the Department of Health, to develop guidelines for parental contact.

Any person licensed as administrative or instructional personnel by the Board of Education and employed by a local school board who, in the scope of his employment, has reason to believe, as a result of direct communication from a student, that such student is at imminent risk of suicide, shall, as soon as practicable, contact at least one of such student’s parents to ask whether such parent is aware of the student’s mental state and whether the parent wishes to obtain or has already obtained counseling for such student. Such contact shall be made in accordance with the provisions of the guidelines required by subsection C.

If the student has indicated that the reason for being at imminent risk of suicide relates to parental abuse or neglect, this contact shall not be made with the parent. Instead, the person shall, as soon as practicable, notify the local department of social services of the county or city wherein the child resides or wherein the abuse or neglect is believed to have occurred or the state Department of Social Services’ toll-free child abuse and neglect hotline, as required by §

63.2-1509

. When giving this notice to the local or state department, the person shall stress the need to take immediate action to protect the child from harm.

The Board of Education, in cooperation with the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services and the Department of Health, shall develop guidelines for making the contact required by subsection A. These guidelines shall include, but need not be limited to, (i) criteria to assess the suicide risks of students, (ii) characteristics to identify potentially suicidal students, (iii) appropriate responses to students expressing suicidal intentions, (iv) available and appropriate community services for students expressing suicidal intentions, (v) suicide prevention strategies which may be implemented by local schools for students expressing suicidal intentions, (vi) criteria for notification of and discussions with parents of students expressing suicidal intentions, (vii) criteria for as-soon-as-practicable contact with the parents, (viii) appropriate sensitivity to religious beliefs, and (ix) legal requirements and criteria for notification of public service agencies, including, but not limited to, the local or state social services and mental health agencies. These guidelines may include case studies and problem-solving exercises and may be designed as materials for in-service training programs for licensed administrative and instructional personnel.

History.

1999, c. 425; 2009, cc. 813, 840.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1999, c. 425, cl. 2, provides: “That the Board of Education, in cooperation with the Department of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services and the Department of Health, shall develop, publish and distribute the guidelines required by § 22.1-272.1 to the local school divisions by October 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, c. 425, cl. 3, provides: “That, notwithstanding the effective date of this act, no person shall be required to comply with the parental contact requirements set forth in § 22.1-272.1 until the guidelines of the Board of Education are developed, published, and distributed to the local school divisions.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical, and substituted “Behavioral Health and Developmental” for “Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse” near the beginning of subsection C.